New York, session 2025-2026, S6355.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of 2 section 2590-b of the education law, as amended by chapter 103 of the 3 laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) nine voting members who shall be parents of students who are or 5 have been at any time enrolled in a bilingual or English as a second 6 language program conducted pursuant to section thirty-two hundred four 7 of this chapter[, some of whom may be parents of students who have been 8 in such a program within the preceding two years], to be selected by 9 parents of students who receive or have at any time received such 10 services pursuant to a representative process developed by the chancel- 11 lor. Such members shall serve a two year term and shall be eligible to 12 continue serving their term following the conclusion of their child's 13 enrollment in a bilingual or English as a second language program; 14 § 2. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 6 of section 15 2590-b of the education law, as added by chapter 345 of the laws of 16 2009, is amended to read as follows: 17 (iii) one voting member who shall be a parent of a student who is or 18 has been at any time enrolled in a bilingual or English as a second 19 language program conducted in a public high school. Such member shall be 20 appointed by the city-wide council on English language learners, and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10424-03-6 S. 6355--A 2 1 shall serve a two year term and shall be eligible to continue serving 2 their term following the conclusion of their child's enrollment in a 3 bilingual or English as a second language program; 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 5 the amendments to section 2590-b of the education law made by sections 6 one and two of this act shall not affect the expiration or repeal of 7 such provisions and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith.